Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3810.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3b. new text end new text begin Automated driving system. new text end new text begin "Automated driving system" means hardware and software that are collectively capable of performing all aspects of the dynamic driving task for a vehicle on a part-time or full-time basis, described as levels 4 and 5 automation in SAE International standard J3016, as revised in April 2021. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 24a. new text end new text begin Dynamic driving task. new text end new text begin (a) "Dynamic driving task" means all of the following aspects of driving: new text end new text begin (1) operational aspects, including steering, braking, accelerating, and monitoring the vehicle and the roadway; and new text end new text begin (2) tactical aspects, including responding to events, determining when to change lanes, turning, using signals, and other related actions. new text end new text begin (b) Dynamic driving task does not include strategic aspects, including determining destinations or way points of driving. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [169.763] AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEMS IN COMMERCIAL MOTOR VEHICLES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this section, "commercial motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, section 390.5. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Restrictions. new text end new text begin (a) A person must not use an automated driving system to perform the dynamic driving task in a commercial motor vehicle unless a natural person who is properly licensed to operate the vehicle: new text end new text begin (1) is physically present in the commercial motor vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) is seated in the driver's seat of the commercial motor vehicle; new text end new text begin (3) monitors the performance of the commercial motor vehicle while driving on the roadway; and new text end new text begin (4) intervenes, if necessary, to avoid illegal or unsafe driving of the commercial motor vehicle. new text end new text begin (b) The owner or lessor of a commercial motor vehicle operated in violation of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor for the first offense and a gross misdemeanor for any subsequent offense committed by the same owner or lessor regardless of whether the offense is committed with a different commercial motor vehicle owned or leased by the same person. The penalty for the second conviction for violating this section is $2,000, and the penalty doubles for each subsequent conviction. new text end